New York, session 2025-2026, A7130.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 669-e of the education law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. The commissioner shall authorize the department and the board of 4 education, in accordance with qualitative and quantitative skills 5 assessments of students' performance, standards regarding (a) what grade 6 level STEM education is introduced prior to higher education, (b) what 7 constitutes an acceptable curriculum for STEM, and (c) the creation of 8 an evaluative rubric to examine student and teacher progress in STEM 9 fields. The board and department are also authorized to create a curric- 10 ulum for training teachers who will be engaged in STEM fields to 11 adequately prepare them for STEM curriculum in their classrooms. Such 12 curriculum must be made available to all teachers responsible for 13 science and math courses in primary and secondary schools and all teach- 14 ers must have the opportunity to train under new STEM standards. 15 § 2. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 16 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 17 63. The commissioner shall direct the department and the board of 18 education to promulgate rules and regulations regarding science, tech- 19 nology, engineering and math (STEM) education pursuant to subdivision 20 six of section six hundred sixty-nine-e of this chapter. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10967-01-5